Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 11. Wyoming Narcotics and Drug Abuse Board

§ 35-7-1101.
Established; composition; compensation of members.

There is hereby established the “Wyoming narcotics and drug abuse board”. The board shall be composed of the attorney general of Wyoming or his designee, the director of the department of health or his designee and the members of the board of pharmacy. The members shall not receive any compensation in the performance of their duties, but they shall receive per diem, travel expense and mileage expense in the same manner and amount as employees of the state.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 211, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-371.10; Laws 1977, ch. 176, § 2; 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to per diem and traveling expenses of state employees, see §

9-3-102

.